Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-3423
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer
on Death Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not
modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c),
or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section
103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2012, LB536, § 23.